Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [160.086] ROAD EASEMENT INFORMATION REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Easement" means the acquisition or designation of private or public land for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, or improving public roads or related infrastructure. new text end new text begin (c) "Minimum standards" means the minimum design standards specified for rural and suburban undivided roadways specified in Minnesota Rules, parts 8820.9920 and 8820.9926. new text end new text begin (d) "Public report" means a publicly available written report outlining the justification and details for an easement. new text end new text begin (e) "Road authority" means the commissioner for roads and highways under state jurisdiction and a county for roads and highways under a county's jurisdiction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Justification required for certain projects. new text end new text begin Before a relevant road authority proceeds with acquiring an easement for a road construction, reconstruction, or reconditioning project for a rural or suburban undivided roadway, the road authority must determine whether the project meets the commissioner's minimum standards. If the easement is used for the construction, reconstruction, or reconditioning of a roadway at a greater road width than specified in the minimum standards, the relevant road authority may only acquire the land for drainage or road safety reasons. Before acquiring the easement and proceeding with the road construction, reconstruction, or reconditioning project, the road authority must: new text end new text begin (1) publish a public report that meets the requirements of subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (2) provide justification for the easement at a public or county board hearing detailing where the easement is proposed to be acquired. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Public report requirements; format and accessibility; public comment. new text end new text begin (a) The road authority's public report must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a clear description of the proposed easement, project scope, location, dimensions, and purpose; and new text end new text begin (2) a detailed description of the necessity of the proposed easement, including: new text end new text begin (i) safety concerns, including but not limited to the mitigation of traffic hazards, visibility issues, or any other motivation for the easement; new text end new text begin (ii) drainage concerns, such as alleviating flooding, improving water runoff or quality, or ensuring compliance with environmental standards; or new text end new text begin (iii) a statement explicitly declaring that no safety or drainage reasons exist for the easement. new text end new text begin (b) The road authority must prepare the public report free of excessive technical jargon, format the report for ease of public understanding, and publish the report on the road authority's website and project website where applicable. The public must be provided an opportunity to submit written comments on the proposed easement. A minimum of 30 days must be provided for public review and comment on the public report before any action is taken on the proposed easement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to road construction projects on or after that date. new text end